North Dakota, session 69, HB1101.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 3 of section 19-03.1-05 of the North Dakota
Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
3. Opiates. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any of the
following opiates, including their isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and salts of isomers,
esters, and ethers, whenever the existence of those isomers, esters, ethers, and salts
is possible within the specific chemical designation:
a. Acetylmethadol.
b. Allylprodine.
c. Alphacetylmethadol.
d. Alphameprodine.
e. Alphamethadol.
f. Benzethidine.
g. Betacetylmethadol.
h. Betameprodine.
i. Betamethadol.
j. Betaprodine.
k. Brorphine.
l. Clonitazene.
m. Dextromoramide.
n. Diampromide.
o. Diethylthiambutene.
Page No. 1 25.0607.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
p. Difenoxin.
q. Dimenoxadol.
r. Dimepheptanol.
s. Dimethylthiambutene.
t. Dioxaphetyl butyrate.
u. Dipipanone.
v. Ethylmethylthiambutene.
w. Etonitazene.
x. Etoxeridine.
y. Furethidine.
z. Hydroxypethidine.
aa. Isotonitazene (also known as N,N-diethyl-2-(2-(4- isopropoxybenzyl)-5-nitro-1H-
benzimidazol-1-yl)ethan-1-amine).
bb. Ketobemidone.
cc. Levomoramide.
dd. Levophenacylmorphan.
ee. Mitragynine (also known as 7 - hydroxymitragynine and Kratom) .
ff. Morpheridine.
ff.gg. MPPP (also known as 1-methyl-4-phenyl-4-propionoxypiperidine).
gg.hh. Noracymethadol.
hh.ii. Norlevorphanol.
ii.jj. Normethadone.
jj.kk. Norpipanone.
kk.ll. PEPAP (1-(2-Phenylethyl)-4-Phenyl-4-acetoxypiperidine).
ll. mm. Phenadoxone.
mm.nn.Phenampromide.
nn.oo. Phenomorphan.
oo.pp. Phenoperidine.
pp.qq. Piritramide.
qq.rr. Proheptazine.
rr.ss. Properidine.
Page No. 2 25.0607.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
ss.tt. Propiram.
tt.uu. Racemoramide.
uu.vv. Tilidine.
vv.ww. Trimeperidine.
ww.xx. 3,4-dichloro-N-[2-(dimethylamino)cyclohexyl]-N-methylbenzamide (also known as
U-47700).
xx.yy. 1-cyclohexyl-4-(1,2-diphenylethyl)piperazine (also know as MT-45).
yy.zz. 3,4-dichloro-N-{[1-(dimethylamino)cyclohexyl]methyl}benzamide (also known as
AH-7921).
zz.aaa. Zipeprol.
aaa.bbb. 2-(2-(4-butoxybenzyl)-5-nitro-1H-benzimidazol-1-yl)-N,N-diethylethan-1-
amine (also known as Butonitazene).
bbb.ccc. 2-(2-(4-ethoxybenzyl)-1H-benzimidazol-1-yl)-N,N-diethylethan-1-amine
(also known as Etodesnitazene and etazene).
ccc.ddd. N,N-diethyl-2-(2-(4-fluorobenzyl)-5-nitro-1H-benzimidazol-1-yl)ethan-1-
amine (also known as Flunitazene).
ddd.eee. N,N-diethyl-2-(2-(4-methoxybenzyl)-1H-benzimidazol-1-yl)ethan-1-amine
(also known as Metodesnitazene).
eee.fff. N,N-diethyl-2-(2-(4-methoxybenzyl)-5-nitro-1H-benzimidazol-1-yl)ethan-1-amine
(also known as Metonitazene).
fff.ggg. 2-(4-ethoxybenzyl)-5-nitro-1-(2-(pyrrolidin-1-yl)ethyl)-1H-benzimidazole (also
known as N-Pyrrolidino Etonitazene and Etonitazepyne).
ggg.hhh. N,N-diethyl-2-(5-nitro-2-(4-propoxybenzyl)-1H-benzimidazol-1-yl)ethan-1-
amine (also known as Protonitazene).
hhh.iii. Fentanyl derivatives. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another
schedule or are not FDA approved drugs, and are derived from N-(1-(2-
Phenylethyl)-4-piperidinyl)-N-phenylpropanamide (Fentanyl) by any substitution
on or replacement of the phenethyl group, any substitution on the piperidine ring,
any substitution on or replacement of the propanamide group, any substitution on
the anilido phenyl group, or any combination of the above. Examples include:
Page No. 3 25.0607.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
(1) N-[1-(1-methyl-2-phenethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylacetamide (also known
as Acetyl-alpha-methylfentanyl).
(2) N-[1-(alpha-methyl-beta-phenyl)ethyl-4-piperidyl]propionanilide; 1-(1-methyl-
2-phenylethyl)-4-(N-propanilido)piperidine (also known as Alpha-
methylfentanyl).
(3) N-[1-methyl-2-(2-thienyl)ethyl-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide (also
known as Alpha-methylthiofentanyl).
(4) N-[1-(2-hydroxy-2-phenethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide (also
known as Beta-hydroxyfentanyl).
(5) N-[1-(2-hydroxy-2-phenethyl)-3-methyl-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide
(also known as Beta-hydroxy-3-methylfentanyl).
(6) N-[3-methyl-1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidyl]-N-phenylpropanamide (also
known as 3-Methylfentanyl).
(7) N-[3-methyl-1-(2-thienyl)ethyl-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide (also
known as 3-Methylthiofentanyl).
(8) N-(4-fluorophenyl)-N-[1-(2-phenethyl)-4-piperidinyl]propanamide (also
known as Para-fluorofentanyl).
(9) N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-thienyl)ethyl-4-piperidinyl]propanamide (also known as
Thiofentanyl).
(10) N-(1-phenylethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylfuran-2-carboxamide (also known
as Furanyl Fentanyl).
(11) N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylbutyramide; N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-
4-yl)-N-phenylbutanamide (also known as Butyryl Fentanyl).
(12) N-[1-[2-hydroxy-2-(thiophen-2-yl)ethyl]piperidin-4-yl]-N-phenylpropionamide;
N-[1-[2-hydroxy-2-(2-thienyl)ethyl]-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide (also
known as Beta-Hydroxythiofentanyl).
(13) N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylacetamide (also known as Acetyl
Fentanyl).
(14) N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylacrylamide (also known as Acryl
Fentanyl).
Page No. 4 25.0607.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
(15) N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylpentanamide (also known as Valeryl
Fentanyl).
(16) N-(4-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)isobutyramide (also known
as 4-Fluoroisobutyryl Fentanyl).
(17) N-(2-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)propionamide (also known
as Ortho-fluorofentanyl, 2-Fluorofentanyl).
(18) N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenyltetrahydrofuran-2-carboxamide (also
known as Tetrahydrofuranyl Fentanyl).
(19) 2-methoxy-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylacetamide (also known as
Methoxyacetyl Fentanyl).
(20) N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylcyclopropanecarboxamide (also
known as Cyclopropyl Fentanyl).
(21) N-(2-fluorophenyl)-2-methoxy-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)acetamide (also
known as Ocfentanil).
(22) N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylcyclopentanecarboxamide (also
known as Cyclopentyl Fentanyl).
(23) N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylisobutyramide (also known as
Isobutyryl Fentanyl).
(24) N-(4-chlorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)isobutyramide (also known
as Para-chloroisobutyryl Fentanyl).
(25) N-(4-methoxyphenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)butyramide (also known
as Para-methoxybutyryl Fentanyl).
(26) N-(4-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)butyramide (also known as
Para-fluorobutyryl Fentanyl).
(27) N-(1-(2-fluorophenethyl)piperidin-4-yl)-N-(2-fluorophenyl)propionamide (also
known as 2'-fluoro Ortho-fluorofentanyl; 2'-fluoro 2-fluorofentanyl).
(28) N-(2-methylphenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)acetamide (also known as
Ortho-methyl Acetylfentanyl; 2-methyl acetylfentanyl).
(29) N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N,3-diphenylpropanamide (also known as
Beta'-phenyl Fentanyl; 3-phenylpropanoyl fentanyl and Hydrocinnamoyl
Fentanyl).
Page No. 5 25.0607.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
(30) N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylthiophene-2-carboxamide (also
known as Thiofuranyl Fentanyl; 2-thiofuranyl fentanyl; thiophene fentanyl).
(31) (E)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylbut-2-enamide (also known as
Crotonyl Fentanyl).
(32) N-(1-(4-methylphenethyl)piperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylacetamide (4'-methyl acetyl
fentanyl).
(33) N-phenyl-N-(1-(2-phenylpropyl)piperidin-4-yl)propionamide (beta-methyl
fentanyl).
(34) N-(2-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)butyramide (ortho-
fluorobutyryl fentanyl; 2-fluorobutyryl fentanyl).
(35) 2-methoxy-N-(2-methylphenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)acetamide
(ortho-methyl methoxyacetylfentanyl; 2-methyl methoxyacetyl fentanyl).
(36) N-(4-methylphenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)propionamide (para-
methylfentanyl; 4-methylfentanyl).
(37) N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylbenzamide (phenyl fentanyl; benzoyl
fentanyl).
(38) Ethyl (1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)(phenyl)carbamate (fentanyl carbamate).
(39) N-(2-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)acrylamide (ortho-fluoroacryl
fentanyl).
(40) N-(2-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)isobutyramide (ortho-
fluoroisobutyryl fentanyl).
(41) N-(4-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)furan-2-carboxamide (para-
fluoro furanyl fentanyl).
Page No. 6 25.0607.02000